Ohio, session 136, HB325.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5534.429 of the Revised Code be 5
enacted to read as follows: 6
Sec. 5534.429. In addition to any other name prescribed i n 7
the Revised Code or otherwise, the northbound and southbound 8
lanes of state route number thirteen between state route number 9
seventy-eight and state route number three hundred twenty-nine, 10
in Athens county, shall be known as the "Marshal Teddy Ray 11
Holcomb Memorial Highway." 12
The director of transportation may erect suitable markers 13
along the highway indicating its name. 14